Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB87.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335B.010 TO 335B.070 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The General Assembly finds a compelling public interest in removing barriers to
employment opportunities and occupational licenses for citizens of the Commonwealth
who have been convicted of a crime. Employers can increase their hiring prospects by
offering positions to this historically untapped pool of workers who have taken
rehabilitative steps in preparation for participation in the workforce, and reenter
society as productive citizens, rather than being defined by a past crime.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335B.010 TO 335B.070 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a hiring or licensing authority considers a criminal background check as part
of their application process, the authority shall establish and implement a process
in which an individual who has been convicted of a crime can obtain a
determination about whether the crime will disqualify the individual from a
position of public employment or an occupation for which a professional license
is required. A hiring or licensing authority shall display on its website its
application policy and procedures pertaining to an individual with a criminal
background. The application instructions shall include the following:
(a) That the application process may include a background check by the
Kentucky State Police or the Administrative Office of the Courts, and may
require the applicant to submit to fingerprinting;
(b) That a criminal conviction may disqualify an applicant from obtaining a
position of public employment or an occupational license; and
(c) That the applicant shall submit the information described in subsection (2)
of Section 3 of this Act to the hiring or licensing authority within a
Page 1 of 7
HB008710.100 - 29 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:39 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 87/GA
reasonable time determined by the authority.
(2) A hiring or licensing authority shall provide the public notice as described in
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) To all applicants within fourteen (14) days of application or selection for an
interview; and
(b) To educational institutions that provide education and training in the areas
of study requiring an occupational license to practice for prospective
applicants.
(3) A hiring or licensing authority shall:
(a) No later than January 1, 2026:
1. Formulate policies and procedures as necessary to carry out the
provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section; and
2. Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A related to subsections (1) and (2) of this section; and
(b) Provide the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committee on Licensing, Occupations, and Administrative
Regulations a report by November 1, 2026, to confirm that an application
process as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section has been
established and is being utilized.
Section 3. KRS 335B.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall be disqualified from public employment, nor shall a person be
disqualified from pursuing, practicing, or engaging in any occupation for which a
license is required solely because of a prior conviction of a crime, unless the crime
for which convicted directly relates to the position of employment sought or the
occupation for which the license is sought.
(2) In determining if a conviction directly relates to the position of public employment
sought or the occupation for which the license is sought, the hiring or licensing
Page 2 of 7
HB008710.100 - 29 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:39 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 87/GA
authority shall consider:
(a) The individual's criminal history, including but not limited to:
1. The nature and seriousness of the crime;
2. The individual's age when the offense was committed;
3. The length of time since the offense was committed;
4. The relationship of the crime to the public employment position
sought or the occupation for which the license is sought; and
5. The relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity, and fitness
required to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the
public employment position or licensed occupation;
(b) The individual's employment history;
(c) The individual's current financial support and legal responsibilities for his
or her dependents;
(d) A certificate or proof of active participation in a behavioral, substance
abuse, or educational program;
(e) The individual's supportive character references and recommendations;
and
(f) Any bonding requirements for the occupation for which the license is
sought.
(3) The hiring or licensing authority's decision regarding the person's criminal
record shall be binding on the hiring or licensing authority regarding the
person's subsequent application unless there is an adverse change in the
person's criminal record[
The nature and seriousness of the crime for which the individual was convicted and
the passage of time since its commission;
(b) The relationship of the crime to the purposes of regulating the position of
public employment sought or the occupation for which the license is sought;
Page 3 of 7
HB008710.100 - 29 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:39 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 87/GA
(c) The relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity, and fitness required to
perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the position of
employment or occupation].
Section 4. KRS 335B.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) When a criminal background check is required by a hiring or licensing
authority under subsection (1) of Section 2 of this Act, an individual may
submit his or her application and have that application considered by the
authority before pursuing any training or specialized education that is
required for the position of public employment or occupation. A hiring or
licensing authority shall:
1. Request that the individual submit the information listed in subsection
(2) of Section 3 of this Act to the hiring or licensing authority within a
reasonable time as determined by the authority;
2. Afford the individual an opportunity for an in-person, telephone, or
video hearing; and
3. Evaluate the applicant's testimony and the evidence of items listed in
subsection (2) of Section 3 of this Act, and determine if the conviction
relates to the position of public employment sought or the occupation
for which a license is sought prior to taking any action on the
application.
(b) If, after evaluating the evidence as described in subsection (2)(a) of Section
of 3 of this Act, a hiring or licensing authority denies an individual a position
of public employment or a license solely because of the individual's prior
conviction of a crime, the hiring or licensing authority shall provide the
individual with written findings of fact including but not limited to[notify
the individual in writing of the following]:
1. The grounds and reasons for the denial or disqualification, citing facts
Page 4 of 7
HB008710.100 - 29 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:39 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 87/GA
as they relate to specific items of consideration in subsection (2) of
Section 3 of this Act;
2. That the individual has the right to a hearing conducted in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13B, if written request for hearing is made within ten
(10) working days after service of notice;
3. The earliest date the person may reapply for a position of public
employment or a license; and
4. That new or previously submitted evidence of rehabilitation may be
considered upon reapplication.
(c)[(b)] Any party aggrieved by a final order issued by a hiring or licensing
authority after a hearing under this subsection may appeal to Franklin Circuit
Court or the Circuit Court of the county in which the appealing party
resides in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(2) (a) [Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, ]A hiring or licensing
authority shall not disqualify an individual from a position of public
employment or from pursuing, practicing, or engaging in any occupation for
which a license is required solely because of the individual's prior conviction
of a crime, unless the authority provides the individual with a written notice
that the authority has determined that the prior conviction may disqualify the
person, demonstrates the connection between the prior conviction and the
position of public employment or a license being sought, and affords the
individual an opportunity to be personally heard before the board prior to the
board making a decision on whether to disqualify the individual. If the
position of public employment or license is denied after the person was heard,
the hiring or licensing authority shall notify the individual in writing of the
following:
1. The grounds and reasons for the denial or disqualification;
Page 5 of 7
HB008710.100 - 29 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:39 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 87/GA
2. That the individual has the right to a hearing conducted in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13B, if a written request for hearing is made within
ten (10) working days after service of notice;
3. The earliest date the person may reapply for a position of public
employment or license; and
4. That evidence of rehabilitation may be considered upon reapplication.
(b) [If an individual's prior conviction was for a Class A felony, a Class B felony,
or any felony offense that would qualify the individual as a registrant pursuant
to KRS 17.500, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that a connection
exists between the prior conviction and the license being sought.
(c) ]Any party aggrieved by a final order issued by a hiring or licensing authority
after a hearing under this subsection may appeal to Franklin Circuit Court or
the Circuit Court of the county in which the appealing party resides in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(3) [Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, ]In any administrative
hearing or civil litigation authorized under this section, the hiring or licensing
authority shall carry the burden of proof on the question of whether the prior
conviction directly relates to the position of public employment sought or the
occupation for which the license is sought.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335B.010 TO 335B.070 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Section 2 of this Act shall not apply to:
(1) Cities;
(2) Counties;
(3) Urban-county governments;
(4) Charter county governments;
(5) Consolidated local governments;
Page 6 of 7
HB008710.100 - 29 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:39 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 87/GA
(6) Unified local governments; or
(7) Any political subdivisions of any entity listed in subsections (1) to (6) of this
section.
Page 7 of 7
HB008710.100 - 29 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:39 AM GA